Maryland, session 2025, SB0165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–401 through 7–421 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–402 through 7–422, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–401.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0165*

SENATE BILL 165
(A) THE GOVERNOR ANNUALLY SHALL PROCLAIM JANUARY 13 AS KOREAN
AMERICAN DAY.
(B) THE PROCLAMATION SHALL URGE EDUCATIONAL AND CULTURAL
ORGANIZATIONS TO OBSERVE KOREAN AMERICAN DAY PROPERLY WITH
APPROPRIATE PROGRAMS, CEREMONIES, AND ACTIVITIES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.